Nebraska, session 109, LB169A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB169A LB169A
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $278,900 from the
General Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $262,100 from the General Fund for
FY2026-27 to the Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 169, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per
diems from funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $190,900
for FY2025-26 or $197,000 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-